test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s17_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - berja: # 
    berja+V+Inf: berja
    berja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bardi
    berja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bardu
    berja+V+Sup: bart
    berja+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bardur
    berja+V+Inf: berja
